Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.330

Annexation of territory authorized—Petition—Hearing—Boundaries.

The district board, upon receiving a written petition for annexation containing a description of the territory sought to be annexed, signed by registered voters in said territory equal in number to at least ten percent of the number of votes cast in the territory for the office of governor at the last gubernatorial election prior to the time the petition is presented, shall set the petition for hearing. It shall publish notice of the hearing along with a copy of the petition, stating the time and place set for the hearing, in each county in which any part of the district or of the territory is situated, and in each city situated wholly or in part in the territory. Not more than five of the names attached to the petition need appear in the publication, but the number of signers shall be stated.

At the time set for the hearing the district board shall hear persons appearing in behalf of the petition and all protests and objections to it. The district board may adjourn the hearing from time to time, but not exceeding two months in all.

On the final hearing the district board shall make such changes as it believes advisable in the boundaries of the territory, and shall define and establish the boundaries. It shall also determine whether the petition meets the requirements of this chapter.

[ 1957 c 153 s 33.]